Alabama, session 2026rs, HB487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the Opioid
Treatment and Abatement Fund the sum of $43,138,650 for the
fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, to the entities and for
the purposes specified herein:
(1) To the Board of Pardons and Paroles for additional
recovery and facility services at CARE in Thomasville and PREP
facility modifications, $1,500,000;
(2) To the Department of Mental Health, $26,360,000. Of
this amount $2,000,000 shall be used for Medicaid State Match;
$1,000,000 shall be used for residential detox; $1,000,000
shall be used to purchase Naloxone; $4,000,000 shall be used
for the 988 Crisis Line; $8,930,000 shall be used for
prevention, treatment, and recovery grants; $7,500,000 shall
be used for co-occurring civil commitment beds; $1,300,000
shall be used for the continuation of the statewide marketing
Page 1

shall be used for the continuation of the statewide marketing
HB487 Enrolled
campaign; $500,000 shall be used for adolescent substance
abuse treatment; and $130,000 shall be used for medical
medicine education by the Alabama Society of Addiction
Medicine;
(3) To Auburn University for the expansion of the
Harrison College of Pharmacy, K-12 Opioid Prevention Program,
$1,900,000;
(4) To The University of Alabama at Birmingham for the
Psychiatry Residency Program, $2,000,000;
(5) To the USA Health University of South Alabama for
Safer Prescriptions and Diversion Reduction Campaign, EMS
Hotspot, and 211 Integration support, $1,100,000;
(6) To the Administrative Office of Courts for
Specialty Courts, $3,000,000;
(7) To the District Attorneys to be allocated equally
to each district, $2,100,000;
(8) To the Child Advocacy Centers for counseling
sessions, family advocacy sessions, and forensic interviews,
$2,136,650;
(9) To the Office of Prosecution Services for school
resource addiction awareness, and jail support for opioid
treatment of inmates, in cooperation with the Alabama
Sheriff's Association, $1,092,000;
(10) To the Department of Forensic Sciences to increase
lab capacity and purchase of additional fentanyl detection
instrumentation, $450,000;
(11) To the Department of Senior Services for Seniors
and Grandparents Programs, $500,000; and
Page 2

and Grandparents Programs, $500,000; and
HB487 Enrolled
(12) To the Department of Corrections, $1,000,000. This
funding shall be used to support four initiatives: (i)
expansion of medication-assisted treatment (MOUD) for
incarcerated individuals in work release and general
population settings; (ii) enhancement of recovery services
through evidence-based electronic programming and telehealth
counseling, requiring investment in software and devices;
(iii) implementation of harm-reduction measures by providing
Naloxone to individuals upon release; and (iv) expansion of
substance abuse classes through distance learning.
Section 2. (a) For the fiscal year ending September 30,
2026, the $5,000,000 that was appropriated to the Department
of Mental Health from the Opioid Treatment and Abatement Fund
in Act 2025-255 of the 2025 Regular Session to be used to
establish a dedicated opioid treatment center shall be
transferred from the Department of Mental Health to the
Department of Public Health.
(b) In addition to all other appropriations heretofore
or hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated for the fiscal
year ending September 30, 2026, the $5,000,000 transferred to
the Department of Public Health in subsection (a) to
establish a dedicated opioid treatment center using the
Therapeutic Community Treatment Model through an RFP.
Section 3. All funds appropriated in this act not
expended in the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, shall
not revert, but shall be carried forward for the purpose
appropriated.
Section 4. This act shall become effective June 1,
Page 3

Section 4. This act shall become effective June 1,
HB487 Enrolled
2026.
Page 4

2026.
HB487 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



100 ________________________________________________
101 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
102
103
104 House of Representatives
105
106 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
107 was passed by the House 26-Feb-26.
108
109 John Treadwell
110 Clerk
111
112
113
114
115
116 Senate 02-Apr-26 Amended and Passed
117
118 House 07-Apr-26 Concurred in Senate
119 Amendment
120
121
Page 5